Alaska, session 34, SB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 37.13.140(b) is repealed and reenacted to read: 05 (b) The corporation shall determine the amount available for appropriation 06 each year. The amount available for appropriation each fiscal year is the following 07 percentage of the average market value of the fund for the first five of the preceding 08 six fiscal years, including the fiscal year just ended, computed annually for each listed 09 fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles: 10 FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDING PERCENTAGE 11 June 30, 2029 4.9 12 June 30, 2030 4.8 13 June 30, 2031 4.7 14 June 30, 2032 4.6 01 June 30, 2033, and thereafter 4.5. 02 * Sec. 2. AS 37.13.140(b), as repealed and reenacted by sec. 1 of this Act, is amended to 03 read: 04 (b) The corporation shall determine the amount available for appropriation 05 each year. The amount available for appropriation [EACH FISCAL YEAR] is 4.5 06 percent [THE FOLLOWING PERCENTAGE] of the average market value of the 07 fund for the first five of the preceding six fiscal years, including the fiscal year just 08 ended, computed annually for each [LISTED] fiscal year in accordance with generally 09 accepted accounting principles [: 10 FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDING PERCENTAGE 11 JUNE 30, 2029 4.9 12 JUNE 30, 2030 4.8 13 JUNE 30, 2031 4.7 14 JUNE 30, 2032 4.6 15 JUNE 30, 2033, AND THEREAFTER 4.5]. 16 * Sec. 3. AS 37.13.140 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 17 (c) In this section, "average market value of the fund" includes the balance of 18 the earnings reserve account established under AS 37.13.145, but does not include that 19 portion of the principal attributed to the settlement of State v. Amerada Hess, et al., 20 1JU-77-847 Civ. (Superior Court, First Judicial District). 21 * Sec. 4. Section 2 of this Act takes effect July 1, 2032. 22 * Sec. 5. Except as provided in sec. 4 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 2028. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.